Utah statutes.
48-2e-118.   Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The Legislature of this state has power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and all domestic and foreign limited partnerships subject to this chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

